src/fst/morphology/affixes/numerals.lexc
! Divvun & Giellatekno - open source grammars for Sámi and other languages
! Copyright © 2000-2010 The University of Tromsø & the Norwegian Sámi Parliament
! http://giellatekno.uit.no & http://divvun.no
!
! This program is free software; you can redistribute and/or modify
! this file under the terms of the GNU General Public License as published by
! the Free Software Foundation, either version 3 of the License, or
! (at your option) any later version. The GNU General Public License
! is found at http://www.gnu.org/licenses/gpl.html. It is
! also available in the file $GTHOME/LICENSE.txt.
!
! Other licensing options are available upon request, please contact
! giellatekno@uit.no or feedback@divvun.no

! ############################## !
!! # North Saami numerals
! ############################## !


LEXICON C_NOBNUM
+Num+Sg+Nom:  K ;
+Num+Sg+Acc:  K ;
+Num+Sg+Gen:  K ;
+Num+Sg+Loc:as  K ;

LEXICON NOBNUM
+Num+Sg+Nom:  K ;
+Num+Sg+Gen:  K ;
+Num+Sg+Acc:  K ;
+Num+Sg+Loc:s  K ;



! Case forms of the basic digits
! ------------------------------

LEXICON OKTA   !!≈ * **@CODE@** Case forms of the basic digits
 +Num+Sg+Nom: K ;
 +Num+Ess:%>n K ;
 +Num+Sg+Acc:%>X4 K ;
 +Num+Sg+Gen:%>X4 K ;
 +Num+Sg+Ill+Attr:%>X4 K ;
 +Num+Sg+Loc+Attr:%>X4 K ;
 +Num+Cmp/SgGen:»X4 NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ; ! golmmagielat
 +Num+Sg+Loc:%>X4s K ;
 +Num+Sg+Loc+Err/Orth+Use/NG:%>X4n K ; ! !SOUTH
 +Num+Pl+Nom:%>X4t K ;
 +Num+Sg+Ill:%>X3j K ;
 +Num+Sg+Com:%>X5jn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Acc:%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Gen:%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Ill+Attr:%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Ill:%>X5jde K ;
 +Num+Pl+Loc:%>X5jn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Com+Attr:%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Com:%>X5jgujn K ;

LEXICON BEALOKTA   !!≈ * **@CODE@** Case forms of the basic digits, only sg
 +Num+Sg+Nom: K ;
 +Num+Ess:%>n K ;
 +Num+Sg+Acc:%>X4 K ;
 +Num+Sg+Gen:%>X4 K ;
 +Num+Sg+Ill+Attr:%>X4 K ;
 +Num+Sg+Loc+Attr:%>X4 K ;
 +Num+Sg+Loc:%>X4s K ;
 +Num+Sg+Loc+Err/Orth+Use/NG:%>X4n K ; ! !SOUTH
 +Num+Sg+Ill:%>X3j K ;
 +Num+Sg+Com:%>X5jn K ;



LEXICON BARE-LOHKAI   !!≈ * **@CODE@**
+Num+Sg+Nom:#lohká%>j K ;
+Num+Sg+Nom+Err/Orth:∑-lohká%>j K ;
+Num+Attr:#lohká%>j K ;
+Num+Attr+Err/Orth:∑-lohká%>j K ;

LEXICON OKTANUPPELOHKAI   !!≈ * **@CODE@**
 +Num+Sg+Nom:#nuppe#lohká%>j K ;
 +Num+Ess:#nuppe#lohki%>n K ;
 +Num+Ess+Use/NG:#nuppe#logi%>n K ;
 +Num+Sg+Acc:#nuppe#lohká%>j K ;
 +Num+Sg+Gen:%>X4#nuppe#logi K ;
 +Num+Cmp/SgGen:%>X4#nuppe#logi NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;            ! golmmagielat
 +Num+Cmp/SgGen:%>X4#nuppe#lot NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;            ! golmmagielat
 +Num+Sg+Nom+Attr:#nuppe#lot K ;
 +Num+Ess+Attr+Use/NG:#nuppe#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Gen+Attr+Use/NG:#nuppe#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Acc+Attr+Use/NG:#nuppe#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Com+Attr+Use/NG:#nuppe#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Ill+Attr+Use/NG:#nuppe#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Loc+Attr+Use/NG:#nuppe#lot K ;
 +Num+Ess+Attr+Use/NG:%>n#nuppe#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Gen+Attr+Use/NG:%>X4#nuppe#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Acc+Attr+Use/NG:%>X4#nuppe#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Com+Attr+Use/NG:%>X5jn#nuppe#lot K ;
! +Num+Sg+Nom+Attr:#nuppe#lot K ;
! +Num+Ess+Attr+Use/NG:%>n#nuppe#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Ill+Attr+Use/NG:%>X4#nuppe#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Loc+Attr+Use/NG:%>X4#nuppe#lot K ;
! +Num+Sg+Com+Attr+Use/NG:%>X5jn#nuppe#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Loc:%>X4#nuppe#logi%>s K ;
 +Num+Sg+Loc+Err/Orth:%>X4#nuppe#logi%>n K ; ! !SOUTH
 +Num+Pl+Nom:#nuppe#logi%>t K ;
 +Num+Sg+Ill:%>X4#nuppe#lohká%>j K ;
 +Num+Sg+Com:%>X5jn#nuppe#logi%>jn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Acc:#nuppe#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Gen:#nuppe#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Ill:#nuppe#logi%>jde K ;
 +Num+Pl+Loc:%>X5jn#nuppe#logi%>jn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Com:#nuppe#logi%>jgujn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Loc+Use/NG:#nuppe#logi%>jn K ; !Nickel 91 from here downwards
 +Num+Pl+Nom+Attr:%>X4t#nuppe#lot K ;
 +Num+Pl+Gen+Attr+Use/NG:%>X5jd#nuppe#lot K ;
 +Num+Pl+Acc+Attr+Use/NG:%>X5jd#nuppe#lot K ;
 +Num+Pl+Ill+Attr+Use/NG:%>X5jd#nuppe#lot K ;
 +Num+Pl+Com+Attr+Use/NG:%>X5jd#nuppe#lot K ;
 +Num+Pl+Loc+Attr+Use/NG:%>X5jn#nuppe#lot K ;
 +Num+Pl+Nom+Use/NG:%>X4t#nuppe#logi%>t K ;
 +Num+Pl+Acc+Use/NG:%>X5jd#nuppe#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Gen:%>X5jd#nuppe#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Ill+Attr:%>X5jd#nuppe#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Com+Attr:%>X5jd#nuppe#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Ess+Use/NG:%>X4t#nuppe#logi%>n K ;

LEXICON BEALOKTANUPPELOHKAI   !!≈ * **@CODE@** only sg
 +Num+Sg+Nom:#nuppe#lohká%>j K ;
 +Num+Ess:#nuppe#lohki%>n K ;
 +Num+Ess+Use/NG:#nuppe#logi%>n K ;
 +Num+Sg+Acc:#nuppe#lohká%>j K ;
 +Num+Sg+Gen:%>X4#nuppe#logi K ;
 +Num+Sg+Nom+Attr:#nuppe#lot K ;
 +Num+Ess+Attr+Use/NG:#nuppe#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Gen+Attr+Use/NG:#nuppe#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Acc+Attr+Use/NG:#nuppe#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Com+Attr+Use/NG:#nuppe#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Ill+Attr+Use/NG:#nuppe#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Loc+Attr+Use/NG:#nuppe#lot K ;
 +Num+Ess+Attr+Use/NG:%>n#nuppe#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Gen+Attr+Use/NG:%>X4#nuppe#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Acc+Attr+Use/NG:%>X4#nuppe#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Com+Attr+Use/NG:%>X5jn#nuppe#lot K ;
! +Num+Sg+Nom+Attr:#nuppe#lot K ;
! +Num+Ess+Attr+Use/NG:%>n#nuppe#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Ill+Attr+Use/NG:%>X4#nuppe#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Loc+Attr+Use/NG:%>X4#nuppe#lot K ;
! +Num+Sg+Com+Attr+Use/NG:%>X5jn#nuppe#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Loc:%>X4#nuppe#logi%>s K ;
 +Num+Sg+Loc+Err/Orth:%>X4#nuppe#logi%>n K ; ! !SOUTH
 +Num+Sg+Ill:%>X4#nuppe#lohká%>j K ;
 +Num+Sg+Com:%>X5jn#nuppe#logi%>jn K ;
 +Num+Ess+Use/NG:%>X4t#nuppe#logi%>n K ;

LEXICON OKTAGOALMMATLOHKAI   !!≈ * **@CODE@**
 +Num+Sg+Nom:#goalmmát#lohká%>j K ;
 +Num+Ess:#goalmmát#lohki%>n K ;
 +Num+Ess+Use/NG:#goalmmát#logi%>n K ;
 +Num+Sg+Acc:#goalmmát#lohká%>j K ;
 +Num+Sg+Gen:%>X4#goalmmát#logi K ;
 +Num+Cmp/SgGen:%>X4#goalmmát#logi NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;            ! golmmagielat
 +Num+Cmp/SgGen:%>X4#goalmmát#lot NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;            ! golmmagielat
 +Num+Sg+Gen+Attr:%>X4#goalmmát#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Ill+Attr:%>X4#goalmmát#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Loc+Attr:%>X4#goalmmát#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Nom+Attr+Use/NG:#goalmmát#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Com+Attr+Use/NG:%>X5jn#goalmmát#lot K ;
 +Num+Ess+Attr+Use/NG:%>n#goalmmát#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Acc+Attr:%>X4#goalmmát#lot K ;
! +Num+Sg+Attr+Use/NG:#goalmmát#lot K ;
! +Num+Sg+Attr+Use/NG:%>X5jn#goalmmát#lot K ;
! +Num+Sg+Attr+Use/NG:%>n#goalmmát#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Loc:%>X4#goalmmát#logi%>s K ;
 +Num+Sg+Loc+Err/Orth:%>X4#goalmmát#logi%>n K ; ! !SOUTH
 +Num+Pl+Nom:#goalmmát#logi%>t K ;
 +Num+Sg+Ill:%>X4#goalmmát#lohká%>j K ;
 +Num+Sg+Com:%>X5jn#goalmmát#logi%>jn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Acc:#goalmmát#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Gen:#goalmmát#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Ill:#goalmmát#logi%>jde K ;
 +Num+Pl+Loc:%>X5jn#goalmmát#logi%>jn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Com:#goalmmát#logi%>jgujn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Loc:#goalmmát#logi%>jn K ; !Nickel 91 from here downwards
 +Num+Pl+Nom+Attr:%>X4t#goalmmát#lot K ;
 +Num+Pl+Gen+Attr+Use/NG:%>X5jd#goalmmát#lot K ;
 +Num+Pl+Acc+Attr+Use/NG:%>X5jd#goalmmát#lot K ;
 +Num+Pl+Ill+Attr+Use/NG:%>X5jd#goalmmát#lot K ;
 +Num+Pl+Com+Attr+Use/NG:%>X5jd#goalmmát#lot K ;
 +Num+Pl+Loc+Attr+Use/NG:%>X5jn#goalmmát#lot K ;
 +Num+Pl+Nom:%>X4t#goalmmát#logi%>t K ;
 +Num+Pl+Acc+Use/NG:%>X5jd#goalmmát#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Gen:%>X5jd#goalmmát#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Ill+Attr:%>X5jd#goalmmát#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Com+Attr:%>X5jd#goalmmát#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Ess+Use/NG:%>X4t#goalmmát#logi%>n K ;


LEXICON OKTANJEALJATLOHKAI   !!≈ * **@CODE@**
 +Num+Sg+Nom:#njealját#lohká%>j K ;
 +Num+Ess:#njealját#lohki%>n K ;
 +Num+Ess+Use/NG:#njealját#logi%>n K ;
 +Num+Sg+Acc:#njealját#lohká%>j K ;
 +Num+Sg+Gen:%>X4#njealját#logi K ;
 +Num+Cmp/SgGen:%>X4#njealját#logi NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;            ! golmmagielat
 +Num+Cmp/SgGen:%>X4#njealját#lot NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;            ! golmmagielat
 +Num+Sg+Gen+Attr:%>X4#njealját#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Loc+Attr:%>X4#njealját#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Ill+Attr:%>X4#njealját#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Nom+Attr+Use/NG:#njealját#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Com+Attr+Use/NG:%>X5jn#njealját#lot K ;
 +Num+Ess+Attr+Use/NG:%>n#njealját#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Acc+Attr:%>X4#njealját#lot K ;
! +Num+Sg+Attr+Use/NG:#njealját#lot K ;
! +Num+Sg+Attr+Use/NG:%>X5jn#njealját#lot K ;
! +Num+Sg+Attr+Use/NG:%>n#njealját#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Loc:%>X4#njealját#logi%>s K ;
 +Num+Sg+Loc+Err/Orth:%>X4#njealját#logi%>n K ; ! !SOUTH
 +Num+Pl+Nom:#njealját#logi%>t K ;
 +Num+Sg+Ill:%>X4#njealját#lohká%>j K ;
 +Num+Sg+Com:%>X5jn#njealját#logi%>jn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Acc:#njealját#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Gen:#njealját#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Ill:#njealját#logi%>jde K ;
 +Num+Pl+Loc:%>X5jn#njealját#logi%>jn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Com:#njealját#logi%>jgujn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Loc+Use/NG:#njealját#logi%>jn K ; !Nickel 91 from here downwards
 +Num+Pl+Nom+Attr+Use/NG:%>X4t#njealját#lot K ;
 +Num+Pl+Gen+Attr+Use/NG:%>X5jd#njealját#lot K ;
 +Num+Pl+Acc+Attr+Use/NG:%>X5jd#njealját#lot K ;
 +Num+Pl+Ill+Attr+Use/NG:%>X5jd#njealját#lot K ;
 +Num+Pl+Com+Attr+Use/NG:%>X5jd#njealját#lot K ;
 +Num+Pl+Loc+Attr+Use/NG:%>X5jn#njealját#lot K ;
 +Num+Pl+Nom+Use/NG:%>X4t#njealját#logi%>t K ;
 +Num+Pl+Acc+Use/NG:%>X5jd#njealját#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Gen:%>X5jd#njealját#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Ill+Attr:%>X5jd#njealját#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Com+Attr:%>X5jd#njealját#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Ess+Use/NG:%>X4t#njealját#logi%>n K ;
